District of Columbia statutes.
9-1201.07

Removal of obstructions from streets.

It shall be the duty of the Director of the National Park Service to cause obstructions of every kind to be removed from such streets, avenues, and sidewalks in the City of Washington as have been, or may be, improved in whole or in part by the United States, and to keep the same, at all times, free from obstructions. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section, the Director of the National Park Service shall have power to institute suits in any court having competent jurisdiction, and it shall be the duty of the United States Attorney for the District to prosecute the same.

R.S., D.C., §§ 226, 227
Feb. 26, 1925, 43 Stat. 983, ch. 339, § 3
Highway plans, jurisdiction of mayor over roads and bridges, see § 9-101.02.
1981 Ed., § 7-1407.
1973 Ed., § 7-1207.